Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.204

Hybrid motor vehicle.

"Hybrid motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that uses multiple power sources or fuel types for propulsion and meets the federal definition of a hybrid motor vehicle.

[ 2010 c 161 s 121.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.